District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Affordable Housing Tax Assessment Alignment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Data sharing of Affordability Covenants
Within 180 days after the effective date of this act and every quarter thereafter, for
purposes of ensuring that the property value assessment includes government-imposed

restrictions such as affordability covenants, the Mayor shall provide to the Office of Tax and
Revenue (“OTR”) a list, in the manner requested by and including the data elements required by
OTR, of all real properties in the District that are subject to affordability restrictions,
inclusionary zoning, and any other restrictions imposed by the District designed to render the
real properties, or any parts thereof, affordable.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.